California statutes. Education Code
The board at the time may make its appointment or may make a substitute appointment or recommendation without further notification or public hearing.

In the case of the nominees of the classified employees, the board shall appoint the nominee, unless the classified employees voluntarily withdraw the name of the nominee and submit the name of a new nominee. In the latter case, the board shall then appoint the new nominee.

(e) In the event a vacancy exists because of a failure of the classified employees to agree on a nominee, the board may make an emergency appointment as authorized in subdivision (b) of Section 88065. If there is no personnel director, the board may nevertheless make an emergency interim appointment under this subdivision.

(f) At the next regularly scheduled personnel commission meeting to be held after 30 days from adoption of the system, as specified in subdivision (a), or at the next regularly scheduled personnel commission meeting to be held after 30 days from the day the intended appointee is announced, as specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), as the case may be, the appointee or appointees of the governing board and the appointee or appointees nominated by the classified employees shall, in an open hearing, provide the public and employees and employee organizations the opportunity to express their views on the qualifications of each candidate recommended for the vacancy. Each candidate shall be invited to this meeting.

The appointee or appointees of the governing board and the appointee or appointees nominated by the classified employees may make their appointment or may make a substitute appointment or recommendation without further notification or public hearing.

(g) A commissioner whose term has expired may continue to discharge the duties of the office until a successor is appointed, but for no more than 90 calendar days. This subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1296, Sec. 35.   Effective October 11, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

88067.

Appointees to a commission in a district which has newly adopted the system shall take office upon receipt of notification of the appointment but the term of office shall run from noon of the first day of December next succeeding.

In community college districts with a three-member personnel commission, the initial appointee of the governing board shall serve a three-year term, and the term of the appointee recommended by classified employees and the third member selected by the other two members shall be for two years and one year respectively.

In community college districts which have elected to establish a five-member personnel commission, one of the initial appointees of the governing board, and one of the initial appointees nominated by the classified employees shall serve three-year terms. The term of the other initial appointee of the governing board and the other initial appointee nominated by the classified employees of the district, shall be for two years, and the term of the appointee selected by the other members of the commission shall be for one year.

Subsequent terms shall be for three years commencing at noon the first day of December.

A three-member commission may perform any act authorized or required by law when two members have been appointed.

A five-member commission may perform any act authorized or required by law when three members have been appointed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 723, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

88068.

(a) Appointment to vacancies occurring subsequent to the initial appointment shall be made by the original appointing authority either for a new full term or to fill an unexpired term. The procedures required in Sections 88065 and 88066 shall be followed in the appointment and recommendation for appointment to fill vacancies occurring subsequent to the initial appointments.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) the governing board at the request of the personnel director shall declare that an emergency exists and shall make an interim appointment to fill a vacancy or vacancies to insure the continuance of the functions of the personnel commission. An interim appointment shall terminate on the date the notification of permanent appointment is received by the appointee.

(c) An interim appointee must meet the requirements of Section 88064 and be free of the restrictions contained therein.

(d) An interim appointment in no event shall be valid for more than 60 days.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88069.

(a) (1) After January 1, 2001, the classified employees of any community college district that has already adopted this article on September 17, 1965, may, in accordance with this article, petition the governing board to request that the process to determine how personnel commission members are appointed be determined by a majority vote of the classified employees entitled to vote. That petition shall read substantially as follows:

“We, the undersigned classified employees of the ____ (name of community college district), constituting 15 percent or more of the classified personnel entitled to vote, request the governing board to submit to an election the question of how personnel commission members shall be appointed.NAME ____ POSITION CLASSIFICATION ____”

(2) “Classified employee,” as used in this section, shall be construed to include all personnel who are a part of the classified service as defined in Section 88001.

(b) (1) Within 90 days after receipt of a petition pursuant to subdivision (a), the governing board shall conduct an election by secret ballot of its classified personnel to determine the following question and the ballot shall read:

“Shall personnel commission members in the ____ (name of community college district) be appointed as follows:

(A) One member appointed by the governing board of the district.

(B) One member appointed by the classified employees of the district.

(C) Those two members shall, in turn, appoint the third member.

____ Yes

____ No”

(2) Although the ballot conducted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall not require the employees’ signatures or other personal identifying requirements, the governing board shall devise an identification system to ensure against fraud in the balloting process.

(3) The governing board shall appoint a three- to five-person tabulating committee. At least one member of the committee shall be a member of the governing board, to canvass the ballots and present the results to the governing board and one member shall be a classified employee nominated by the exclusive representative of the classified employees of the district. If a simple majority votes in favor of the process for appointing personnel commission members, that process shall become applicable in the district as follows:

(A) The first vacancy on the commission shall be filled by a person nominated by the classified employees of the district.

(B) The second vacancy on the commission shall be filled by a person appointed by the governing board of the district.

(C) The third vacancy of the commission shall be appointed by the first two members.

(4) If the ballot conducted pursuant to paragraph (2) fails to pass, personnel commission members shall be appointed in accordance with the procedure described in subdivision (c), and a petition by the classified employees for another election shall not occur sooner than two years after an election.

(c) (1) Subject to subdivisions (a) and (b), in a community college district that has already adopted this article on September 17, 1965, members of the personnel commission shall be appointed by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges who shall consider the recommendation of the governing board and other interested parties.

(2) If the governing board and the personnel commission of a community college district elect to increase the personnel commission from three to five members, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall make one of the additional appointments. Subsequent appointments shall be made in accordance with this section.

(3) No later than 90 days before making the appointment, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall notify the classified employees and the governing board in writing of the vacancy on the personnel commission and provide them with guidelines and procedures for making a recommendation and challenging a nomination. If a vacancy occurs during the term of a member of the personnel commission, the chancellor may appoint a new member after providing the foregoing notice no later than 30 days before making the appointment.

(4) A commissioner whose term has expired may continue to discharge the duties of the office until a successor is appointed but for no more than 90 calendar days.

(d) As used in this section, “classified employees” means an organization of classified employees that represents the greatest number of classified employees of the district as determined by the board. If no organization exists within the district, the governing board, by written rule, shall prescribe the method by which the recommendation is to be made by its classified employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 488, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

88070.

The governing board may authorize payment to members of the commission an amount not to exceed fifty dollars ($50) per meeting and not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 723, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

88071.

In a community college district with an average daily attendance in excess of 40,000 and which is located in a metropolitan area with a population of more than 4,000,000, the governing board may authorize payment to members of the commission an amount not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per meeting, and not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 723, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

88072.

The governing board shall provide the commission with suitable office accommodations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88073.

The commission shall prepare an annual budget for its own office which, upon the approval of the county superintendent of schools, shall be included by the governing board in the regular budget of the community college district. The annual budget of the commission may include amounts for the purposes of Section 88075.

The budget shall be prepared for a public hearing by the commission to be held not later than May 30 of each year. The commission shall forward a copy of its proposed budget to the governing board indicating the time, date and place for the public hearing of the budget and shall invite board and district administration representatives to attend and present their views. The commission shall fully consider the views of the governing board prior to adoption of its proposed budget. The commission shall then forward its proposed budget to the county superintendent of schools for action.

If the county superintendent of schools proposes to reject the budget as submitted by the commission, he shall, within 30 days after the commission’s submission of the budget, hold a public hearing on the proposed rejection within the affected district. He shall have informed both the commission and the governing board of the date, time and place of the hearing. He may after such public hearing either reject, or, with the concurrence of the commission, amend the proposed budget. In the absence of agreement between the personnel commission and the county superintendent the budget of the preceding year shall determine the amount of the new budget, and the items of expenditure shall be determined by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88075.

The commission may, with respect to the staff of the commission, expend funds for their orientation, training, retraining, and development and for any purpose prescribed by Article 7 (commencing with Section 88220) of this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88076.

(a) The commission shall classify all employees and positions within the jurisdiction of the governing board of the community college district or of the commission, except those that are exempt from the classified service, as specified in subdivision (b). The employees and positions shall be known as the classified service. “To classify” shall include, but not be limited to, allocating positions to appropriate classes, arranging classes into occupational hierarchies, determining reasonable relationships within occupational hierarchies, and preparing written class specifications.

(b) The following positions and employees are exempt from the classified service:

(1) Academic positions.

(2) Full-time students employed part time.

(3) Part-time students employed part time in a college work-study program or in a work experience education program conducted by a community college that is financed by state or federal funds.

(4) Part-time students employed part time as student-tutors by their community college district of enrollment.

(5) Apprentice positions.

(6) Positions established for the employment of professional experts on a temporary basis for a specific project by the governing board of a
 community college district or by the commission when so designated by the commission.

(c) Employment of either full-time or part-time students in a college work-study program or in a work experience education program shall not result in the displacement of classified personnel or impair existing contracts for services.

(d) This section shall not prevent an employee who has attained regular status in a full-time position from taking a voluntary reduction in time and retaining the employee’s regular status under the provisions of this law.

(e) A person whose contribution consists solely in the rendition of individual personal services and whose employment does not come within the scope of the exceptions listed above
 shall not be employed outside the classified service.

(f) A part-time position is one for which the assigned time, when computed on an hourly, daily, weekly, or monthly basis, is less than 8712 percent of the normally assigned time of the majority of employees in the classified service.

(g) An employee employed by a community college district in a part-time playground position as of the effective date of the laws placing part-time playground positions into the classified service
 shall be deemed a permanent employee of the community college district without placement on an eligibility list under Section 88091 or examination under Section 88092.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 422, Sec. 2.   (AB 2931)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

88077.

Nothing contained in Section 88076 shall be interpreted to exclude the employment of architectural and engineering firms employed on a temporary basis for a specific project by a governing board or the commission when so designated by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88078.

In addition to the exemptions authorized in Section 88076, there shall be exempt from the classified service positions established for the employment of community representatives in advisory or consulting capacities for not more than 90 working days in a fiscal year, provided that:

(1) The authorized duties are not those normally assigned to a class of positions in the classified service,

(2) The authorized duties are approved by the personnel commission in advance of employment, and

(3) A regular classified employee of the community college district shall not receive a concurrent appointment to such a position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88079.

If the governing board of any community college district establishes positions and restricts initial appointment of new employees to mentally, physically, or developmentally disabled persons, then such positions shall, in addition to the regular class title, be classified as “restricted.” The positions shall be part of the classified service and persons so employed shall be classified employees for all purposes except that they shall not be subject to the provisions of Section 88091 or 88092, and that they shall not acquire permanent status or seniority credit and shall not be eligible for promotion into the regular classified service until they have complied with the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 88005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1206, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

88080.

(a) The commission shall prescribe and, amend, and interpret subject to this article, such rules as may be necessary to insure the efficiency of the service and the selection and retention of employees upon a basis of merit and fitness. The rules shall not apply to bargaining unit members if the subject matter is within the scope of representation, as defined in Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, and is included in a negotiated agreement between the governing board and that unit. The rules shall be binding upon the governing board, but shall not restrict the authority of the governing board provided pursuant to other sections of this code.

(b) No rule or amendment which would affect classified employees who are represented by a certified or recognized exclusive bargaining representative shall be adopted by the commission until the exclusive bargaining representative and the community college employer of the classified employees who would be affected have been given reasonable notice of the proposal.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1514, Sec. 5.5) by Stats. 1984, Ch. 521, Sec. 16.)
-------------------------------------------

88081.

(a) The rules shall provide for the procedures to be followed by the governing board as they pertain to the classified service regarding applications, examinations, eligibility, appointments, promotions, demotions, transfers, dismissals, resignations, layoffs, reemployment, vacations, leaves of absence, compensation within classification, job analyses and specifications, performance evaluations, public advertisement of examinations, rejection of unfit applicants without competition, and any other matters necessary to carry out the provisions and purposes of this article.

(b) With respect to those matters set forth in subdivision (a) which are a subject of negotiation under the provisions of Section 3543.2 of the Government Code, such rules as apply to each bargaining unit shall be in accordance with the negotiated agreement, if any, between the exclusive representative for that unit and the public school employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1014.)
-------------------------------------------

88082.

The rules of the commission and copies of this article shall be printed and made available to each school, office, and permanent worksite where employees report and shall be distributed to school libraries for loan to employees.

Within one year of when a district adopts the merit system, the commission shall adopt rules pursuant to Section 88080 and shall give to each new regular employee a handbook which summarizes the basic rules and working conditions for classified employees and provides information regarding access to copies of the complete rules and the merit system.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88083.

The commission may classify as apprentice positions certain positions where the principal requirement is that of learning to perform efficiently, by study and practice, specific duties concerning which a definite plan of systematic instruction and special supervision has been approved pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 3070) of Division 3 of the Labor Code for the designated trade.

The apprenticeship training plan adopted by the governing board of the community college district shall be approved by the California Apprenticeship Council for building and construction trades or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other trades.

No assignment to any
 position classified as an apprentice position shall be allowed to continue beyond the predetermined apprenticeship period approved by the California Apprenticeship Council for building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other trades, except that the community college district’s joint apprenticeship committee may approve retention of an employee as an apprentice up to six months beyond the predetermined apprentice period.

The selection of eligible persons shall be made in accordance with their position on employment lists established by competitive or qualifying examinations.

Section 88033 shall be applicable to apprentice positions. However, relative age may be considered as a factor in the ranking of candidates for apprentice positions.

Credit for prior training in a
 regularly indentured apprenticeship program shall be given to qualified candidates.

In all cases of apprenticeship probationary periods, the standards of duration and qualifications shall be fixed by the commission insofar as they do not exceed the maximum standards set up by the California Apprenticeship Council for building and construction trades and for firefighters or by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards of the Department of Industrial Relations for other trades. Termination for cause may be prescribed for any apprentice who fails to attain the predetermined standards of apprenticeship or for causes as prescribed by the rules of the commission.

The commission shall recommend to the governing board a graduated scale of compensation rates for the various levels of apprentices, taking into consideration the percentage relationship to the districts’ journeyman wage of the trade as provided in the
 statement of policies of the California Apprenticeship Council.

The commission may determine that promotional examinations shall be held for entrance into various levels of apprentice positions and entrance into journeyman positions in a skilled trade.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 704, Sec. 12.   (AB 235)   Effective September 22, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

88084.

The commission shall appoint a personnel director within 90 days after the adoption of a merit system from an eligibility list established from a competitive examination given under the auspices of the commission. The commission shall appoint all employees paid from funds budgeted for the support of the commission and shall supervise the activities of those employees that are performed as a part of the functions of the commission. These employees shall be appointed from eligibility lists established pursuant to the provisions of this article, be classified employees of the community college district and shall be accorded all the rights, benefits, and burdens of any other classified employee serving in the regular service of the district, including representation by the appropriate exclusive representative, if any.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 572, Sec. 5) by Stats. 1984, Ch. 521, Sec. 18.)
-------------------------------------------

88085.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 88084, the personnel commission, in a community college district employing 100 or fewer classified employees, may, with the consent of a majority of the classified employees, contract for the services of a qualified personnel director with another school district having the merit (civil service) system, or a city or a county governmental agency if the city or county has a civil service system for the management of its employee personnel.

Such a contract shall be for not more than two years and may be extended, with the approval of a majority of the classified employees, for additional periods not to exceed two years at one time.

If at the end of any contract period the district is employing more than 100 classified employees, the personnel commission shall then comply with the provisions of Section 88084.

A contract approved under the provisions of this section shall become null and void in the event of district reorganization when the provisions of the contract, if continued in force would supersede or be in conflict with the provisions of Section 88019.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88086.

(a) The personnel director shall be responsible to the commission for carrying out all procedures in the administration of the classified personnel in conformity with this article and the rules of the commission, and shall be free of prejudgment or bias in order to ensure the impartiality of the commission. He or she shall also act as secretary of the commission and shall prepare, or cause to be prepared, an annual report which shall be sent by the commission to the governing board.

(b) A personnel director shall not advise or make recommendations to the commission regarding any disciplinary action appealed to the commission under Section 88124, if the personnel director is the party who brought the action against the employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 730, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

88086.5.

Sections 88022, 88023, 88160, 88198, 88199, 88201, and 88202 are applicable to the employees of community college districts that have adopted a merit system pursuant to the procedure set forth in this article.

This section is declaratory of existing law. The sections here enumerated are to be construed and applied in the same manner and with the same effect as when they were applicable to the employees of those school districts prior to the enactment of Section 88000 by Chapter 1267 of the Statutes of 1959, and in accordance with the applicable provisions of this article and the rules of the personnel commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 211.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88087.

The commission shall recommend to the governing board salary schedules for the classified service. The governing board may approve, amend, or reject these recommendations. No amendment shall be adopted until the commission is first given a reasonable opportunity to make a written statement of the effect the amendments will have upon the principle of like pay for like service. No changes shall operate to disturb the relationship which compensation schedules bear to one another, as the relationship has been established in the classification made by the commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88088.

Any person who has been continuously employed in a position defined as a position in the classified service for a period of six months immediately preceding the date on which the procedure set forth in this article is adopted shall be deemed to be in the permanent classified service. No layoff or suspension of service during the time when the schools of the district are not in session shall count as an interruption of continuous service.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88089.

All persons who have been continuously employed by a community college district for less than six months immediately preceding the date on which the procedure set forth in this article is adopted shall be deemed to hold their positions under probationary classification.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88090.

Any employee serving in an academic position whose position is by virtue of change of law deemed to be in the classified service shall without examination become a member of the classified service in accordance with the terms of Sections 88088 and 88089. Full seniority rights shall be retained, except that no seniority credit shall be allowed by virtue of previous academic service in case of layoff for lack of funds or lack of work.

Any employee serving in a classified position whose position is by virtue of change of law deemed to be an academic position shall without examination become an academic employee and shall be deemed to have the necessary qualifications for the position. Full seniority rights will be retained, except that no seniority credit will be allowed by virtue of previous classified service in case of layoff for lack of funds or lack of work. Any such person who has been continuously employed in a regular position in the classified service for the length of time necessary to acquire permanency as a faculty member shall, if employed as a faculty member, be deemed to be tenured. Any such person serving in a regular position in the classified service for an amount of time less than that necessary to acquire faculty tenure shall be a probationary employee of the district; such regular classified service shall be considered as probationary service toward the attainment of tenure as a faculty member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1302, Sec. 189.   Effective September 25, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

88091.

(a) All vacancies in the classified service shall be filled pursuant to this article and the rules of the commission, from applicants on eligibility lists which, wherever practicable, as determined by the commission, shall be made up from promotional examinations, or appointments may be made by means of transfer, demotion, reinstatement, and reemployment in accordance with the rules of the commission. All applicants for promotional examinations shall have the required amount of service in classes designated by the commission or meet the minimum qualifications of education, training, experience, and length of service, which shall be determined by the commission to be appropriate for the class for which they have applied. Any promotional applicant who has served the required amount of time in a designated class or who meets the minimum qualifications for admission to a promotional examination shall be admitted to the examination. Applicants shall be placed on the eligibility lists in the order of their relative merit as determined by competitive examinations. The final scores of candidates shall be rounded to the nearest whole percent for all eligibles. All eligibles with the same percentage score will be considered as having the same rank. Appointments shall be made from the eligibles having the first three ranks on the list who are ready and willing to accept the position.

(b) (1) Upon the request of a majority of the members of the governing board of a community college district, the commission may exempt two executive secretarial positions from the requirements of this section. Exemptions authorized under this subdivision shall be limited to one executive secretary position reporting directly to members of the governing board, and one executive secretary position reporting directly to the chancellor.

(2) Any person employed in an exempt executive secretarial position shall continue to be afforded all of the rights, benefits, and burdens of any other classified employee serving in the regular service of the district, except he or she shall not attain permanent status in an executive secretarial position. Positions of executive secretary shall be filled from an unranked list of eligible employees who have been found to be qualified for the positions as determined by the district chancellor or superintendent and determined by the personnel commission. Any person whose services in an executive secretarial position are discontinued for a cause other than a cause for disciplinary action specified in this code or in a rule of the commission shall have the right to return to a position in a classification he or she previously occupied or, if that classification no longer exists, in a similar classification, as determined by the commission. This subdivision shall apply only to the employees hired on or after January 1, 1988.

(c) (1) Upon the request of a majority of the members of the governing board of a community college district, the personnel commission may exempt designated senior classified administrative positions from the requirements of this section. A “senior classified administrative employee” means a classified employee who acts as the chief business, fiscal, facilities, or information technology adviser or administrator for the district chancellor or superintendent or a college president, as determined by the governing board and certified by the personnel commission.

(2) Any person employed in an administrative position exempted under this subdivision shall continue to be afforded all of the rights, benefits, and burdens of any other classified employee serving in the regular service of the district, except that he or she shall not attain permanent status in that administrative position. A vacancy in an administrative position that is exempted under this subdivision shall be filled from an unranked list of eligible persons who have been found to be qualified for the positions as determined by the district chancellor or superintendent and the personnel commission. Any person whose services in an administrative position exempted under this subdivision are discontinued for any reason other than for cause as specified in this code or in a rule of the personnel commission shall have the right to return to a position in a classification he or she previously occupied or, if that classification no longer exists, in a similar classification, as determined by the commission.

(3) This subdivision shall apply only to employees hired on or after January 1, 2001.

(d) Nothing contained in this section shall authorize the selection of eligible candidates in circumvention of the affirmative action programs of any community college district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 951, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

88092.

Examinations shall be administered objectively and shall consist of test parts that relate to job performance.

For classes of positions deemed by the commission or by the authority responsible for the administration of classified employee examinations to require an oral examination, the oral examination board shall include at least two members.

Unless specifically directed to evaluate candidates’ technical knowledge and skills, the oral examination board shall confine itself to evaluating general fitness for employment in the class. When the oral examination board is directed to evaluate technical knowledge and skills, at least two members of the board shall be technically qualified in the specified occupational area. Members of the governing board or personnel commission shall not serve on an oral examination board. A district employee may serve on an oral examination board if he or she is not at the first or second level of supervision over a vacant position in the class for which the examination is held.

The personnel commission shall provide for the proceedings of all oral examinations to be electronically recorded. In no case will an oral examination board be provided with confidential references on employees of the district who are competing in promotional examinations. Scores achieved by the candidate on other parts of the examination shall not be made available to the oral examination board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 212.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88093.

Examination records, including any recordings and the rating sheet of each member of the oral board for each candidate, shall be retained by the body authorized to administer examinations for a period of not less than 90 days after promulgation of an eligibility list. The commission shall prescribe procedures whereby candidates may review and protest any part of an examination. In promotional examinations for classes for which continuous examination procedures have not been authorized, the review and protest period shall be held prior to regular appointment from the eligibility list. Examination records shall not be available to the public or to any person for any purpose not directly connected with the examination and shall be considered confidential but shall, within reasonable time limits, be made available to a candidate or his or her representative.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 213.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

88095.

The governing board shall fix the duties of all positions a part of the classified service as required by Section 88009. The board may recommend the minimum educational and work experience requirements for classified positions to the personnel commission. Minimum qualification requirements shall be subject to approval of the commission.

In approving minimum educational and work experience requirements for classified positions, the commission shall insure that such requirements reasonably relate to the duties of the position, as established by the governing board, and that they will admit an adequate field of competition. No requirements may be approved which unduly or unreasonably restrict the field of competition.

The position duties shall be prescribed by the board and qualification requirements for the position class shall be prepared and approved by the commission, as required by this section, prior to issuance of an announcement calling for a competitive examination to fill position vacancies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88096.

Appointments may be made from other than the first two or three, as the case may be, applicants on the eligibility list when the ability to speak, read, or write a language in addition to English or possession of a valid driver’s license is a requirement of the position to be filled. The recruitment bulletin announcing the examination shall indicate the special requirements which may be necessary for filling one or more of the positions in the class. Where such a position is to be filled, using the authority of this section, the appointment shall be made from among the highest two or three, as the case may be, applicants on the appropriate eligibility list who meet the special requirements and who are ready and willing to accept the position. If there are insufficient applicants who meet the special requirements, the commission shall certify the top applicant or applicants plus those applicants who meet the special requirements, not to exceed two or three candidates, as the case may be.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

88097.
